Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB122.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(f)(1) and (2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(f) Application of section.--(1) For the purposes of this section only, [except as provided by paragraph (2),] "firearm" shall mean any weapon which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.[(2) The provisions contained in subsections (a) and (c) shall only apply to pistols or revolvers with a barrel length 123456789101112131415161718 of less than 15 inches, any shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, any rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches or any firearm with an overall length of less than 26 inches.]* * *Section 2. The provisions of 37 Pa. Code are abrogated to the extent that they are inconsistent with the amendment of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6111(f)(1) and (2).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0122PN0072 - 2 - 123456789